District of Columbia statutes.
34-1259.08

Subscriber fees.

(a)

The cable operator shall publish and make available to each potential subscriber a schedule of all applicable fees and charges for providing cable service and shall notify subscribers that basic cable service is available.

(b)

A cable operator shall not, with regard to fees, discriminate or grant any preference or advantage to any person. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a cable operator from instituting preferential or advantageous fees for the elderly, people with disabilities, or recipients of District or federal public assistance.

(c)

To the extent permitted under applicable law or regulation, a cable operator may, for promotional purposes, waive, reduce, or suspend connection or monthly service fees for specific or indeterminate periods not to exceed 6 months or for a period set forth in a franchise agreement, whichever is shorter.

(d)

The cable operator shall provide a notice of any planned waiver, reduction, or suspension of connection or monthly service fees to the Office at least 30 days before the waiver, reduction, or suspension.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 908
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334